Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.275

Data collection.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

The department shall collect data so that information can be retrieved based on unique individuals, their complete Washington criminal history and referrals for forensic services.

[ 2023 c 453 s 18.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 453: See note following RCW 10.77.060.